Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.08.115

Registration by other than auditor or secretary of state.

A person or organization collecting voter registration application forms must transmit the forms to the secretary of state or a county auditor within five business days. The registration date on such forms will be the date they are received by the secretary of state or county auditor. A person or organization collecting voter registration forms that intentionally does not transmit the forms to an election office may be subject to penalty under RCW 29A.84.030.

[ 2023 c 466 s 35; 2009 c 369 s 11; 2005 c 246 s 8; 2004 c 267 s 108; 2003 c 111 s 207; 1971 ex.s. c 202 s 15; 1965 c 9 s 29.07.110. Prior: 1957 c 251 s 11; prior: 1947 c 68 s 1, part; 1945 c 95 s 1, part; 1933 c 1 s 6, part; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 5114-6, part; prior: 1919 c 163 s 6, part; 1915 c 16 s 6, part; 1901 c 135 s 5, part; 1893 c 45 s 1, part; 1889 p 415 s 6, part; RRS s 5124, part. Formerly RCW 29.07.110.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2005 c 246: See note following RCW 10.64.140.

Effective dates—2004 c 267: See note following RCW 29A.08.010.